Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HCR2041.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 14, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-1803.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-1803.01. Tuition rates; citizens; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents or a community college as defined in section 15-1401 may not charge any individual who is a citizen of the United States a tuition rate that is greater than the tuition rate that the university or community college charges any student who is not a citizen of the United States. B. For the purposes of this section, "tuition" means tuition and mandatory fees charged by a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents or a community college as defined in section 15-1401. END_STATUTE 2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona.